Hawaii statutes.
§516-8 Interested members, officers, or
employees. No member of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation
or officer or employee administering this chapter shall acquire any interest,
direct or indirect, in the ownership or development of any development tract
other than by gift, devise, or inheritance, nor shall the member, officer, or
employee have or acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in the financing or
in any contract or proposed contract for services to be furnished or used in connection
with or relating to the development of any development tract. If any such
member, officer, or employee has or acquires an interest by gift, devise, or
inheritance, direct or indirect, in any development tract or is a lessee of any
residential lot affected by the eminent domain proceedings instituted under
this chapter, the member, officer, or employee shall immediately disclose the
same in writing to the corporation and such disclosure shall be entered upon
the minutes of the corporation. The member, officer, or employee shall not
participate in any action by the corporation relating to the property, tract,
or contract in which the member, officer, or employee has or acquires any such
interest. Violation of this section constitutes misconduct in office and is
cause for dismissal. [L 1967, c 307, §9; HRS §516-8; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c
337, §16; am L 1988, c 104, §2; am L 1997, c 350, §14; am L 2005, c 196, §26(b);
am L 2006, c 180, §16]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next